South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3778.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) The governing body of a school district may waive the requirement that public schools make up full days missed due to inclement weather for public schools in the districts that were closed due to inclement weather associated with Hurricane Helene during the 2024-2025 School Year if the State Superintendent of Education certifies the following: (1) that the district designated at least three days within its school calendar to be used as make-up days in the event of inclement weather; (2) if those designated days were used or were no longer available, that the local school board of trustees waived up to three days; (3) that if forgiveness of additional days was necessary, the State Board of Education waived the requirements of making up days beyond the three days forgiven by the local school district, not to exceed three additional days; (4) that the district has submitted a plan to create a more appropriate schedule and expectations for lengthened school days or Saturday classes in the event of future inclement weather events; and, (5) that the district will seek assistance from the State Department of Education to understand the provisions of Section 59-1-425. (B) When a district waives a make-up day pursuant to this section, the make-up day also is waived for home schooling programs in the district that have been approved by the board of trustees and to charter schools in the district. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----